Washington statutes.
RCW 42.62.010

Definitions—Chapter 42.17A RCW applies. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

The definitions used in chapter 42.17A RCW apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

[ 2023 c 360 s 1.]